Illinois, session 104th, HB3618.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Early Childhood Act is 5amended by changing Section 1-30 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 3/1-30)7    Sec. 1-30. General powers and duties. 8    (a) The Department shall exercise the rights, powers, 9duties, and functions provided by law, including, but not 10limited to, the rights, powers, duties, and functions 11transferred to the Department.12    (a-5) The Department shall establish an Early Childhood 13Integrated Data System (ECIDS) to make equity driven, 14inclusive, and data-informed decisions that create a simpler, 15better, and fairer system for all Illinois children and 16families. 17    The Department shall develop public analytic portals and 18query tools for parents and communities to access aggregated 19integrated data from the ECIDS system to the extent permitted 20by State and federal confidentiality requirements. 21    (b) The Department may employ personnel (in accordance 22with the Personnel Code and any applicable collective 23bargaining agreements), provide facilities, contract for goods   HB3618- 2 -LRB104 11441 KTG 21529 b1and services, and adopt rules as necessary to carry out its 2functions and purposes, all in accordance with applicable 3State and federal law.4    The Department may establish such subdivisions of the 5Department as shall be desirable and assign to the various 6subdivisions the responsibilities and duties placed upon the 7Department by the Laws of the State of Illinois. 8    The Department shall adopt, as necessary, rules for the 9execution of its powers. The provisions of the Illinois 10Administrative Procedure Act are hereby expressly adopted and 11shall apply to all administrative rules and procedures of the 12Department under this Act, except that Section 5-35 of the 13Illinois Administrative Procedure Act relating to procedures 14for rulemaking does not apply to the adoption of any rule 15required by federal law in connection with which the 16Department is precluded by law from exercising any discretion. 17    (c) Procurements necessary for the Department of Early 18Childhood to implement this Act are subject to the Illinois 19Procurement Code, except as otherwise provided in paragraph 20(25) of subsection (b) of Section 1-10 of that Code. The 21Department of Early Childhood is subject to the Business 22Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 23Disabilities Act.24(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 6-25-24.)